Utah statutes.
63G-6a-1702.   Appeal to Utah State Procurement Policy Board -- Appointment of procurement appeals panel -- Proceedings.

(1)  This part applies to all procurement units other than:

(a)  a legislative procurement unit;

(b)  a judicial procurement unit;

(c)  a county or municipality; or

(d)  a public transit district.

(2)  A party to a protest involving a procurement unit other than a procurement described in Subsection (1) may appeal the protest decision to the board by:

(a)  filing a written notice of appeal with the chair of the board within seven days after:

(i)  the day on which the written decision described in Section 63G-6a-1603 is:

(A)  personally served on the party or the party's representative; or

(B)  emailed or mailed to the address or email address of record provided by the party under Subsection 63G-6a-1602(3); or

(ii)  the day on which the 30-day period described in Subsection 63G-6a-1603(5) ends, if a written decision is not issued before the end of the 30-day period;

(b)  including in the filing document the person's address of record and email address of record; and

(c)  at the time that the notice of appeal described in Subsection (2)(a) is filed, complying with the requirements of Section 63G-6a-1703 regarding the posting of a security deposit or a bond.

(3)  A person may not appeal from a protest described in Section 63G-6a-1602, unless:

(a)  a decision on the protest has been issued; or

(b)  a decision is not issued and the 30-day period described in Subsection 63G-6a-1603(5), or a longer period agreed to by the parties, has passed.

(4)  The chair of the board or a designee of the chair who is not employed by the procurement unit responsible for the solicitation, contract award, or other action complained of:

(a)  shall, within seven days after the day on which the chair receives a timely written notice of appeal under Subsection (2), appoint:

(i)  a procurement appeals panel to hear and decide the appeal, consisting of at least three individuals, each of whom shall be:

(A)  a member of the board; or

(B)  a designee of a member appointed under Subsection (4)(a)(i)(A), if the designee is approved by the chair; and

(ii)  one of the members of the procurement appeals panel to be the chair of the panel;

(b)  may:

(i)  appoint the same procurement appeals panel to hear more than one appeal; or

(ii)  appoint a separate procurement appeals panel for each appeal; and

(c)  may not appoint a person to a procurement appeals panel if the person is employed by the procurement unit responsible for the solicitation, contract award, or other action complained of.

(5)  A procurement appeals panel described in Subsection (4) shall:

(a)  consist of an odd number of members;

(b)  except as provided in Subsection (6), conduct an informal proceeding on the appeal within 60 days after the day on which the procurement appeals panel is appointed, unless all parties stipulate to a later date;

(c)  at least seven days before the proceeding, mail, email, or hand-deliver a written notice of the proceeding to the parties to the appeal; and

(d)  within seven days after the day on which the proceeding ends:

(i)  issue a written decision on the appeal; and

(ii)  mail, email, or hand-deliver the written decision on the appeal to the parties to the appeal and to the protest officer.

(6)  A procurement appeals panel may continue a procurement appeals proceeding beyond the 60-day period described in Subsection (5)(b) if the procurement appeals panel determines that the continuance is in the interests of justice.

(7)  A procurement appeals panel:

(a)  shall consider the appeal based solely on:

(i)  the protest decision;

(ii)  the record considered by the person who issued the protest decision; and

(iii)  if a protest hearing was held, the record of the protest hearing;

(b)  may not take additional evidence; and

(c)  shall uphold the decision of the protest officer, unless the decision is arbitrary and capricious or clearly erroneous.

(8)  If a procurement appeals panel determines that the decision of the protest officer is arbitrary and capricious or clearly erroneous, the procurement appeals panel:

(a)  shall remand the matter to the protest officer, to cure the problem or render a new decision;

(b)  may recommend action that the protest officer should take; and

(c)  may not order that:

(i)  a contract be awarded to a certain person;

(ii)  a contract or solicitation be cancelled; or

(iii)  any other action be taken other than the action described in Subsection (8)(a).

(9)  The board shall make rules relating to the conduct of an appeals proceeding, including rules that provide for:

(a)  expedited proceedings; and

(b)  electronic participation in the proceedings by panel members and participants.

(10)  The Rules of Evidence do not apply to an appeals proceeding.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

